sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Varnost in zaščita vozil > Zaščitna oprema za vozila za terensko vožnjo in motorne športe: Oblazinjeni drogovi za štirikolesnike in terenska vozila; ATV- in UTV-varovalni oklep; ATV- in UTV-škornji; ATV- in UTV-rokavice; ATV- in UTV-očala; ATV- in UTV-čelade; Dirkalne podkape; Dirkalni ščitniki za prsi; Dirkalne rokavice; Dirkalna očala; Dirkalne čelade; Dirkalna zaščita za trup; Dirkalne opore za vrat; Dirkalne zaščitne kratke hlače; Dirkalne obleke
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 차량 안전/보안 > 오프로드 및 모터 스포츠 차량 보호 장비: ATV/UTV 바 패드; ATV/UTV 바디 아머; ATV/UTV 부츠; ATV/UTV 장갑; ATV/UTV 고글; ATV/UTV 헬멧; 레이싱 발라클라바; 레이싱 체스트 가드; 레이싱 장갑; 레이싱 고글; 레이싱 헬멧; 레이싱 임팩트 가드; 레이싱 넥 서포트; 레이싱 보호 쇼츠; 레이싱 슈트
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Járműbiztonság és -védelem > Terep- és motorsportjárművek védőfelszerelése: ATV és UTV kormányvédők; ATV- és UTV-testvédők; ATV- és UTV-csizmák; ATV- és UTV-kesztyűk; ATV- és UTV-szemüvegek; ATV- és UTV-sisakok; Versenybalaklavák; Versenymellkasvédők; Versenykesztyűk; Versenyszemüvegek; Versenysisakok; Versenyütközésvédők; Versenynyakvédők; Versenyvédőnadrágok; Versenyruhák
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Безопасност и сигурност на превозни средства > Защитна екипировка за офроуд и моторни спортове: ATV & UTV подложки за лостове; Бронежилетки за ATV и UTV; Ботуши за ATV и UTV; Ръкавици за ATV и UTV; Очила за ATV и UTV; Каски за ATV и UTV; Състезателни балаклави; Състезателни предпазители за гърди; Състезателни ръкавици; Състезателни очила; Състезателни каски; Състезателни противоударни предпазители; Състезателни опори за врат; Състезателни предпазни шорти; Състезателни костюми
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 乗り物の安全・防犯関連用品 > オフロード・モータースポーツ車両用プロテクター: ATV・UTV用バーパッド; ATV・UTVボディアーマー; ATV・UTVブーツ; ATV・UTVグローブ; ATV・UTVゴーグル; ATV・UTVヘルメット; レース用目出し帽; レース用チェストガード; レース用グローブ; レース用ゴーグル; レース用ヘルメット; レース用インパクトガード; レース用ネックサポート; レース用保護ショートパンツ; レース用スーツ
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ความปลอดภัยและการรักษาความปลอดภัยรถยนต์ > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับยานยนต์ออฟโรดและมอเตอร์สปอร์ต: ที่บุบาร์ ATV และ UTV; เกราะป้องกันร่างกายสำหรับรถ ATV และ UTV; รองเท้าบูท ATV และ UTV; ถุงมือ ATV และ UTV; แว่นตาสำหรับรถ ATV และ UTV; หมวกกันน็อคสำหรับรถ ATV และ UTV; หมวกคลุมศีรษะสำหรับแข่งขัน; การ์ดหน้าอกสำหรับการแข่งขัน; ถุงมือแข่งรถ; แว่นตาสำหรับแข่งขัน; หมวกกันน็อคสำหรับแข่งขัน; การ์ดกันกระแทกสำหรับการแข่งขัน; ที่รองคอสำหรับนักแข่ง; กางเกงขาสั้นป้องกันสำหรับการแข่งรถ; ชุดแข่งขัน
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 车辆安全防盗用品 > 越野车/赛车防护装备: ATV / UTV 手把套; ATV / UTV 防护衣; ATV / UTV 靴子; ATV / UTV 手套; ATV / UTV 护目镜; ATV / UTV 头盔; 赛车头套; 赛车护胸; 赛车手套; 赛车护目镜; 赛车头盔; 赛车防撞护罩; 赛车颈托; 赛车防护短裤; 赛车服
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Ajoneuvon turvallisuus > Suojavarusteet maastoautoiluun ja moottoriurheiluun: Mönkijän ja traktorimönkijän tankopehmusteet; Mönkijän ja traktorimönkijän panssariliivit; Mönkijän ja traktorimönkijän saappaat; Mönkijän ja traktorimönkijän käsineet; Mönkijän ja traktorimönkijän suojalasit; Mönkijän ja traktorimönkijän kypärät; Kilpa-ajokommandopipot; Kilpa-ajorintasuojat; Kilpa-ajokäsineet; Kilpa-ajolasit; Kilpa-ajokypärät; Kilpa-ajoiskusuojat; Kilpa-ajoniskatuet; Kilpa-ajosuojashortsit; Kilpa-ajopuvut
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 車輛安全 > 越野車與賽車護具: 全地形車/多功能越野車把手護套; 全地型車與 UTV 防護衣; 全地型車與 UTV 靴; 全地型車與 UTV 手套; 全地型車與 UTV 護目鏡; 全地型車與 UTV 安全帽; 賽車頭套; 賽車護胸; 賽車手套; 賽車護目鏡; 賽車安全帽; 賽車防衝擊護具; 賽車頸撐; 擊劍防護短褲; 賽車服
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ασφάλεια & προστασία οχημάτων > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός εκτός δρόμου και μηχανοκίνητων σπορ οχημάτων: Μαξιλαράκια μπαρών ATV & UTV; Θωράκιση σώματος ATV & UTV; Μπότες ATV & UTV; Γάντια ATV & UTV; Γυαλιά ATV & UTV; Κράνη ATV & UTV; Μπαλακλάβες για αγώνες; Προστατευτικά θώρακα για αγώνες; Γάντια για αγώνες; Γυαλιά για αγώνες; Κράνη για αγώνες; Προστατευτικά χτυπημάτων για αγώνες; Υποστηρίγματα αυχένα για αγώνες; Προστατευτικά σορτς για αγώνες; Στολές για αγώνες
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Sigurnost i zaštita vozila > Zaštitna oprema za terenska vozila i vozila za motosport: Podloge za šipke za ATV i UTV vozila; Zaštitna odjeća za vožnju ATV i UTV vozila; Čizme za vožnju ATV i UTV vozila; Rukavice za vožnju ATV i UTV vozila; Naočale za vožnju ATV i UTV vozila; Kacige za vožnju ATV i UTV vozila; Balaklave za utrke; Štitnici za prsa za utrke; Rukavice za utrke; Naočale za utrke; Kacige za utrke; Štitnici od udara za utrke; Štitnici za vrat za utrke; Zaštitne kratke hlače za utrke; Kombinezoni za utrke
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Seguridad y protección para vehículos > Equipos de protección para vehículos todoterreno y de deportes de motor: Almohadillas para barras de vehículos ATV y UTV; Corazas de protección para vehículos ATV y UTV; Botas para vehículos ATV y UTV; Guantes para vehículos ATV y UTV; Gafas para vehículos ATV y UTV; Cascos para vehículos ATV y UTV; Sotocascos de carreras; Protectores de pecho para carreras; Guantes de carreras; Gafas de carreras; Cascos de carreras; Protectores contra impactos de carreras; Soportes de cuello para carreras; Pantalones cortos protectores para carreras; Trajes de carreras
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Segurança e proteção para veículos > Equipamento de proteção para veículos todo-o-terreno e desportos motorizados: Esponja para barras de ATV e UTV; Colete armadura corporal para ATV e UTV; Botas para ATVs e UTVs; Luvas ATV e UTV; Óculos ATV e UTV; Capacetes ATV e UTV; Balaclavas de corrida; Protetores de peito para corrida; Luvas de corrida; Óculos de corrida; Capacetes de corrida; Protetores de impacto para corrida; Suportes de pescoço para corrida; Calções de proteção para corrida; Fatos de corrida
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Fahrzeugsicherheit > ATV- & UTV-Schutzausrüstung: ATV- & UTV-Griffpolster; ATV- & UTV-Körperschutz; ATV- & UTV-Stiefel; ATV- & UTV-Handschuhe; ATV- & UTV-Brillen; ATV- & UTV-Helme; Sturmhauben für Rennsport; Brustschutz für Rennsport; Rennhandschuhe; Rennbrillen; Rennhelme; Aufprallschutz für Rennsport; Nackenstützen für Rennsport; Schutzshorts für Rennsport; Rennanzüge
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Siguranța și securitatea vehiculelor > Echipament de protecție pentru vehicule off-road și de teren: Inserții bară ATV și UTV; Armură de corp pentru ATV și UTV; Bocanci ATV și UTV; Mănuși ATV și UTV; Ochelari de protecție ATV și UTV; Căști ATV și UTV; Balaclave pentru curse; Protecții pentru piept pentru curse; Mănuși pentru curse; Ochelari pentru curse; Căști pentru curse; Sisteme de protecție la impact pentru curse; Suporturi pentru gât pentru curse; Șorturi de protecție pentru curse; Combinezoane de curse
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Vehicle Safety & Security > Off-Road & Motor Sports Vehicle Protective Gear: ATV & UTV Bar Pads; ATV & UTV Body Armor; ATV & UTV Boots; ATV & UTV Gloves; ATV & UTV Goggles; ATV & UTV Helmets; Racing Balaclavas; Racing Chest Guards; Racing Gloves; Racing Goggles; Racing Helmets; Racing Impact Guards; Racing Neck Supports; Racing Protective Shorts; Racing Suits
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Защитная экипировка и товары для обеспечения безопасности транспортных средств > Защитная экипировка для внедорожного и мотоспорта: Подушки на перекладину руля для мотовездеходов и квадроциклов; Защита тела для мотовездеходов и квадроциклов; Обувь для мотовездеходов и квадроциклов; Перчатки для мотовездеходов и квадроциклов; Очки для мотовездеходов и квадроциклов; Шлемы для мотовездеходов и квадроциклов; Гоночные балаклавы; Гоночные защитные нагрудники; Гоночные перчатки; Гоночные очки; Гоночные шлемы; Гоночные защитные накладки; Гоночные опоры для затылка; Гоночные защитные шорты; Гоночные костюмы
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > An toàn và an ninh xe cộ > Thiết bị bảo vệ xe địa hình và đường địa hình: Đệm thanh ATV và UTV; Áo giáp ATV và UTV; Bốt ATV và UTV; Găng tay ATV và UTV; Kính bảo hộ ATV và UTV; Mũ bảo hiểm ATV và UTV; Mặt nạ trùm đầu cổ che mặt khi đua; Bảo vệ ngực khi đua; Găng tay đua; Kính đua xe; Mũ bảo hiểm đua; Bảo vệ va chạm khi đua; Đệm đeo cổ đua; Quần đùi bảo vệ khi đua; Bộ đồ đua
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Taşıt Güvenliği ve Emniyeti > Off-Road ve Motor Sporları Aracı İçin Koruyucu Kıyafetler: ATV ve UTV Gidon Pedleri; ATV ve UTV Vücut Zırhı; ATV ve UTV Botları; ATV ve UTV Eldivenleri; ATV ve UTV Gözlükleri; ATV ve UTV Kaskları; Yarış Kar Maskeleri; Yarış İçin Göğüs Koruyucuları; Yarış Eldivenleri; Yarış Gözlükleri; Yarış Kaskları; Yarış İçin Darbe Koruyucular; Yarış İçin Boyun Destekleri; Yarış İçin Koruyucu Şortlar; Yarış Tulumları
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonssäkerhet > Skyddsutrustning för terräng- och motorsportfordon: Handtagsskydd för ATV och UTV; Skyddsvästar för ATV och UTV; ATV och UTV-stövlar; ATV och UTV-handskar; ATV och UTV-glasögon; ATV och UTV-hjälmar; Balaclavas för tävlingsbruk; Tävlingsbröstskydd; Tävlingshandskar; Tävlingsglasögon; Tävlingshjälmar; Tävlingsstötskydd; Tävlingsnackstöd; Skyddsutrustning för tävling; Tävlingsdräkter
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Zabezpieczenia pojazdów > Sprzęt ochronny do pojazdów terenowych i sportów motorowych: Osłony poprzeczki kierownicy do quadów i pojazdów użytkowych; Zbroje do ATV i UTV; Buty do ATV i UTV; Rękawice do ATV i UTV; Gogle do ATV i UTV; Kaski do ATV i UTV; Kominiarki wyścigowe; Wyścigowe ochraniacze klatki piersiowej; Rękawice wyścigowe; Gogle wyścigowe; Kaski wyścigowe; Ochraniacze wyścigowe; Wyścigowe ochraniacze szyi; Wyścigowe spodenki ochronne; Kombinezony wyścigowe
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Sicurezza e protezioni per veicoli > Equipaggiamento protettivo per veicoli fuoristrada e per sport motoristici: Cuscinetti per barre per ATV e UTV; Giubbotti antiproiettile per ATV e UTV; Stivali per ATV e UTV; Guanti per ATV e UTV; Occhiali per ATV e UTV; Caschi per ATV e UTV; Passamontagna da corsa; Protezioni per il torace da corsa; Guanti da corsa; Occhiali da corsa; Caschi da corsa; Protezioni antiurto da corsa; Supporti per il collo da corsa; Pantaloncini protettivi da corsa; Tute da corsa
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Bezpečnost a zabezpečení vozidel > Ochranné vybavení na terénní a motorová sportovní vozidla: Chrániče řídítek pro čtyřkolky; Tělové chrániče na čtyřkolky; Boty na čtyřkolky; Rukavice na čtyřkolky; Ochranné brýle na čtyřkolky; Helmy na čtyřkolky; Závodní kukly; Závodní chrániče hrudníku; Rukavice na závodění; Závodní brýle; Závodní přilby; Nárazové chrániče pro závodění; Podpěry krku pro závodění; Ochranné šortky pro závodění; Závodní obleky
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Sécurité des véhicules > Équipement de protection pour véhicules tout-terrain et de sports motorisés: Barres de protection pour véhicules tout-terrain et véhicules utilitaires tout-terrain; Cotte matelassée pour véhicules tout-terrain et véhicules utilitaires tout-terrain; Bottes pour véhicules tout-terrain et véhicules utilitaires tout-terrain; Gants pour véhicules tout-terrain et véhicules utilitaires tout-terrain; Lunettes de protection pour véhicules tout-terrain et véhicules utilitaires tout-terrain; Casques pour véhicules tout-terrain et véhicules utilitaires tout-terrain; Cagoules de course; Protège-poitrine de course; Gants de course; Lunettes de course; Casques de course; Protections contre les chocs de course; Supports de cou de course; Short de protection de course; Combinaisons de course
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Veiligheid en bescherming voor voertuigen > Beschermende uitrusting voor offroad- en motorsportvoertuigen: ATV & UTV stuurkussens; Lichaamsbescherming voor ATV's en UTV's; Laarzen voor ATV's en UTV's; Handschoenen voor ATV's en UTV's; Brillen voor ATV's en UTV's; Helmen voor ATV's en UTV's; Race bivakmutsen; Race borstbeschermers; Racehandschoenen; Racebrillen; Racehelmen; Race impactbeschermers; Race neksteunen; Race beschermende korte broek; Racepakken
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Bezpečnosť a zabezpečenie vozidla > Ochranné vybavenie pre terénne a motorové športové vozidlá: Riadidlá na ATV a UTV; Pancier na ATV a UTV; Čižmy na ATV a UTV; Rukavice na ATV a UTV; Okuliare na ATV a UTV; Prilby na ATV a UTV; Závodné kukly; Závodné chrániče hrudníka; Závodné rukavice; Závodné okuliare; Závodné prilby; Závodné chrániče proti nárazu; Závodné podpery krku; Závodné ochranné šortky; Závodné obleky
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøysikkerhet > Beskyttelsesutstyr for terreng- og motorsportkjøretøy: Stangpute for ATV og UTV; Beskyttelsesvest for ATV og UTV; Støvler for ATV og UTV; Hansker for ATV og UTV; Beskyttelsesbriller for ATV og UTV; Hjelper for ATV og UTV; Finlandshette for racing; Brystvern for racing; Racerhansker; Racerbriller; Racerhjelmer; Støtbeskyttelse for racing; Nakkestøtter for racing; Beskyttelseshorts for racing; Racerdrakter
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Segurança de veículos > Equipamento de proteção para veículos off-road e esportes motorizados: Espuma para barra de direção de veículos off-road; Colete de proteção para veículos off-road; Botas para veículos off-road; Luvas para veículos off-road; Óculos protetores para veículos off-road; Capacetes para veículos off-road; Balaclavas de corrida; Coletes de corrida; Luvas de corrida; Óculos de corrida; Capacetes de corrida; Protetores de impacto de corrida; Suportes de pescoço para corrida; Shorts de proteção para corrida; Trajes de corrida
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Transporto priemonių sauga ir apsauga > Bekelės ir motorinių transporto priemonių sporto apsauginės priemonės: Keturračių vamzdžių paminkštinimai; Keturračių apsauginiai drabužiai; Keturračių batai; Keturračių pirštinės; Keturračių akiniai; Keturračių šalmai; Lenktyninės balaklavos; Lenktyninės krūtinės apsaugos; Lenktyninės pirštinės; Lenktyniniai akiniai; Lenktyniniai šalmai; Lenktyninės apsaugos nuo smūgių; Lenktyninės kaklo atramos; Lenktyniniai apsauginiai šortai; Lenktyniniai kostiumai
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Køretøjssikkerhed > Beskyttelsesudstyr til offroad- og motorsportskøretøjer: Håndtagspads til ATV og UTV; ATV- og UTV-kropsbeskyttelse; ATV- og UTV-støvler; ATV- og UTV-handsker; ATV- og UTV-briller; ATV- og UTV-hjelme; Elefanthuer til racerløb; Brystkassebeskyttelse til racerløb; Racerhandsker; Racerbriller; Racerhjelme; Stødbeskyttelse til racerløb; Nakkestøtter til racerløb; Beskyttelsesshorts til racerløb; Racerdragter